District of Columbia statutes.
2-511

Repealed

Interpreters for the deaf.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 1209, Pub. L. 90-614, § 111, formerly § 12
renumbered, Mar. 25, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96, § 3(a), (c), 23 DCR 9532b
Feb. 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-67, § 2(b), 28 DCR 5043
Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 14(b), 34 DCR 7426
Educational institutions, licensing, internal accreditation evaluation reports, public availability, see § 38-1310.
Insurance fraud, prevention and detection plans, public availability, see § 22-3225.09.
Police and fire departments, office of police complaints, conciliation and mediation, see § 5-1110.
Police officers, fire fighters, and teachers retirement benefit replacement plan, disclosure to the public, see § 1-909.05.
Procurement, administrative and civil remedies, civil investigative demands, see § 2-381.07.
Reinsurance intermediaries, rejections of license applications, public availability, see § 31-1802.
1981 Ed., § 1-1511.